Hawaii, session 2026, SB2126.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 141, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§141-    Farming grant program.  (a)  There is established within the department of agriculture and biosecurity the farming grant program. (b)  Subject to available funds, the farming grant program shall provide grants to small and midsized farms that practice conventional, sustainable, organic, or regenerative farming methods. (c)  Each grant application shall be evaluated by the board of agriculture and biosecurity and shall be approved if the application satisfies the following requirements: (1)  The applicant shall be an owner of a small farm or midsized farm; (2)  If the applicant is an entity other than an individual, the applicant shall: (A)  Be licensed to conduct business in the State; and (B)  Adopt bylaws or policies that describe the manner in which business is conducted, prohibit nepotism, and provide for the management of potential conflicts of interest; (3)  The applicant shall agree to comply with all applicable federal and state laws prohibiting discrimination against any person on the basis of race, color, national origin, religion, creed, sex, age, sexual orientation, disability, or any other characteristic protected under applicable federal or state law; (4)  The applicant shall agree that grant moneys shall not be used for purposes of entertainment or perquisites and shall be used only for the following: (A)  Farming infrastructure and irrigation improvements; (B)  Upgrades to farming equipment; (C)  Costs relating to improving soil health and nutrient management practices; or (D)  Costs relating to the adoption of climate-smart or water conservation techniques; (5)  The applicant shall agree that all activities and improvements undertaken with grant funds shall comply with applicable federal, state, and county laws, including statutes, ordinances, applicable building codes, and rules; (6)  The applicant shall agree to make available to the department of agriculture and biosecurity any records relating to the grant and allow state agencies to verify the applicant's compliance with the purpose of this section; and (7)  The applicant shall comply with other requirements or conditions as the department of agriculture and biosecurity or board of agriculture and biosecurity may prescribe. (d) For the purposes of this section: "Conventional farming" means growing crops from seeds that have been genetically altered using any traditional breeding method, excluding biotechnology, and that are not certified as organic. "Gross cash farm income" means the sum of the farm's crop and livestock sales, government payments, and other farm-related income, including fee payments from contractors. "Midsize farm" means a farm having an annual gross cash farm income of $350,000 to $999,999; provided that, upon approval by the board of agriculture and biosecurity, the department of agriculture and biosecurity may apply a higher annual gross cash farm income amount consistent with the term "midsize farm" or "midsize family farm" as defined by the United States Department of Agriculture's Economic Research Service in a farm typology publication or related update. "Small farm" means a farm having an annual gross cash farm income of less than $350,000; provided that, upon approval by the board of agriculture and biosecurity, the department of agriculture and biosecurity may apply a higher annual gross cash farm income amount consistent with the term "small farm" or "small family farm" as defined by the United States Department of Agriculture's Economic Research Service in a farm typology publication or related update." SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the farming grant program. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of agriculture and biosecurity for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2050.